Connecticut, session 2026, HB05576.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Special act 23-27 is amended to read as follows (Effective
from passage):
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of the general statutes, the Board
of Regents for Higher Education shall convey to the city of New Haven
two parcels of land located in the city of New Haven, at a cost equal to
the administrative costs of making such conveyance. The first parcel of
land has an area of approximately 5.23 acres and is identified as Lot 300
in Block 1304 on city of New Haven Tax Assessor's Map 234, in book
2548 at page 348 of the city of New Haven Tax Assessor's records, and
is further identified on a map entitled "State of Connecticut, Department
of Administrative Services, Bureau of Public Works, Site Construction
Plan, for South Central Community College, 60 Sargent Drive, New
Haven, CT, Project No. BI-RCO-106, Drawing No. 901, William Francis
sHB5576 / File No. 687 1

sHB5576 File No. 687
Griffin & Associates, Milford, Connecticut, Scale 1"=30', Date: January
8, 1976 – AS BUILT". The second parcel of land has an area of
approximately 2 acres and is identified as Lot 403 in Block 314 on city of
New Haven Tax Assessor's Map 234, in book 3529 at page 14 of the city
of New Haven Tax Assessor's records. Said parcels together shall be
referred to in this section as the "subject parcels".
(b) The city of New Haven shall use the subject parcels for economic
development, municipal, utility or institutional purposes and may sell
or lease a portion or all of the subject parcels for any of such purposes.
If, within three years after the conveyance, [(1)] the city of New Haven
does not use the subject parcels for such purposes or for the site
preparation of the subject parcels, [or (2) with respect to a memorandum
of understanding between the city of New Haven and APT Foundation,
Inc. entered into within sixty days after the effective date of this section,
the chairperson of the Board of Regents for Higher Education
determines that either such party has materially breached said
memorandum of understanding,] the subject parcels shall revert to the
state of Connecticut. Any sale of the subject parcels pursuant to this
section shall be made at a cost equal to the fair market value of the
subject parcels, as determined by the average of the appraisals of two
independent appraisers selected by the chairperson of the Board of
Regents for Higher Education. Any funds received by the city of New
Haven from a sale or lease in accordance with this subsection shall be
transferred to the State Treasurer for deposit in the General Fund.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this
section, the conveyance of the subject parcels described in said
subsection shall be contingent upon:
(A) The conveyance of a separate parcel of land from the city of New
Haven, at a cost equal to the administrative costs of making such
conveyance, together with the city's reasonable costs associated with the
preparation of the subject parcels for other development not related to
a new facility for transportation and automotive education, as proposed
by the Board of Regents for Higher Education, provided the Board of
sHB5576 / File No. 687 2

sHB5576 File No. 687
Regents for Higher Education accepts and approves such separate
parcel for development of such facility, which development shall not be
subject to the requirements of chapter 60 of the general statutes;
(B) The execution of an agreement accepted and approved by the
Board of Regents for Higher Education with the city of New Haven or
with a third party for a condominium or leasehold interest for
development of a new facility for transportation and automotive
education, as proposed by the Board of Regents for Higher Education,
within the area of the city's Long Wharf Responsible Growth Plan,
which development shall not be subject to the requirements of chapter
60 of the general statutes; or
(C) The execution of any other agreement among the parties
described in subparagraph (B) of this subdivision that provides for the
Board of Regents for Higher Education to invest in transportation and
automotive education, as envisioned in the Board of Regents for Higher
Education plan known as "CSCU 2030", which plan is a seven-year
proposal seeking investment in support for affordability, student
support services, innovative and expanded academic programs and
modernizing facilities.
(2) Not later than [two years after the effective date of this section]
June 28, 2025, conveyance of the subject parcels or execution of an
agreement described in subparagraph (B) or (C) of subdivision (1) of this
subsection shall occur, except that the city of New Haven and the Board
of Regents for Higher Education may agree in writing to two extensions
of one year each.
(d) Not later than [sixty days after the effective date of this section]
August 27, 2023, the city of New Haven and the Board of Regents for
Higher Education shall prepare a schedule for the timely completion of
the conveyance or conveyances or agreement described in this section.
(e) The State Properties Review Board shall review and approve of
the conveyance of the subject parcels. The subject parcels shall remain
under the care and control of the Board of Regents for Higher Education
sHB5576 / File No. 687 3

sHB5576 File No. 687
until a conveyance of the subject parcels is made in accordance with the
provisions of this section. The State Treasurer shall execute and deliver
a quit claim deed or instrument for such conveyance, which quit claim
deed or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the purposes of
subsection (b) of this section. The chairperson of the Board of Regents
for Higher Education shall have the sole responsibility for all other
incidents of such conveyance.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage SA 23-27
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsec. (c)(2), "two years after the effective date of this section" was
changed to "[two years after the effective date of this section] June 28,
2025", and in Subsec. (d), "sixty days after the effective date of this
section" was changed to "[sixty days after the effective date of this
section] August 27, 2023", for clarity; and in Subsec. (e), ", which quit
claim deed or instrument shall include provisions to carry out the
purposes of subsection (b) of this section" was added for accuracy and
consistency with standard drafting conventions.
GOS Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5576 / File No. 687 4

sHB5576 File No. 687
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect
Board of Regents for Higher Education; Resources of the GF - See Below
General Fund
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect
New Haven See Below
Explanation
The fiscal impact of the bill is unclear, as it is dependent on decisions
made by the city of New Haven and the Board of Regents (BOR). The
bill removes an option from special act 23-27 that would otherwise allow
BOR to undo the conveyance based on a determination of material
breach of a memorandum of understanding (MOU) between the city of
New Haven and APT Foundation Inc.
In most circumstances, the bill is anticipated to have no fiscal impact,
including if 1) the lands in question revert or have already reverted to
original control because of other unchanged requirements of the
conveyance, or 2) BOR was not going to invoke the clause that is
removed in the bill, including if the MOU was already executed and
expired without breach.
The bill would only have a fiscal impact if the transfer of lands was
otherwise going to happen and BOR would have invoked the clause
reverting the conveyance because of the breach of MOU. In this
circumstance, the bill would prevent the reversion of control of the
sHB5576 / File No. 687 5

sHB5576 File No. 687
involved lands, which results in preventing the loss of assets and gain
of assets for both BOR and the city of New Haven and preventing the
preclusion of potential revenue gain from any sale of land that would
have otherwise occurred and been deposited in the General Fund.
The Out Years
The bill removes the possibility that control of lands is reverted
because of the deleted clause in the three years following the
conveyance and has no other impact in the out years.
sHB5576 / File No. 687 6

sHB5576 File No. 687
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5576
AN ACT AMENDING A PRIOR CONVEYANCE OF PARCELS OF
STATE LAND TO THE CITY OF NEW HAVEN.